Tennessee, session 114, SB1911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
In any year in which the summer electronic benefits transfer (SEBT) for children
program established under 42 U.S.C. § 1762 is offered, the department shall apply for,
and if approved, accept federal grants and other federal funds available to this state
through the SEBT program for the purpose of providing nutrition assistance during the
summer months for each eligible child to ensure continued access to food when school
is not in session.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1911
011938
- 1 -